Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1882.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "branch manager" in section 6102 of Title 7 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Branch manager." The supervisor of a branch who is licensed as a mortgage originator under this chapter.* * *Section 2. Section 6112(7)(v) of Title 7 is amended to read:12345678910111213141516171819 § 6112. Exceptions to license requirements.The following persons shall not be required to be licensed under this chapter in order to conduct the mortgage loan business:* * *(7) Affiliates of banking institutions and subsidiaries and affiliates of federally chartered or State-chartered credit unions. The exception under this paragraph does not apply to consumer discount companies. Notwithstanding the exception under this paragraph, subsidiaries and affiliates of federally chartered or State-chartered credit unions and affiliates of banking institutions shall:* * *(v) ensure employees required to be licensed as mortgage originators, excluding branch managers, have completed the requirements under section 6131.1 (relating to prelicensing and continuing education) and have obtained the required mortgage originator license.* * *Section 3. Section 6121 of Title 7 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6121. General requirements.A licensee shall do all of the following:* * *(16) Ensure that font size on all reverse mortgage contracts and disclosures is no smaller than 16-point . Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1882PN2342 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627